Vermont statutes. Title 13 Crimes and Criminal Procedure
Subchapter 2. Embezzlement

§ 2531.
Embezzlement generally.

An officer, agent, bailee for hire, clerk, or servant of a banking association or an incorporated company, or a clerk, agent, bailee for hire, officer, or servant of a private person, partnership, trades union, joint stock company, unincorporated association, fraternal or benevolent association, except apprentices and other persons under the age of 16 years, who embezzles or fraudulently converts to his or her own use, or takes or secretes with intent to embezzle or fraudulently convert to his or her own use, money or other property that comes into his or her possession or is under his or her care by virtue of such employment, notwithstanding he or she may have an interest in such money or property, shall be guilty of embezzlement.

If the money or property embezzled does not exceed $100.00 in value, the person shall be imprisoned not more than one year or fined not more than $1,000.00, or both. If the money or property embezzled exceeds $100.00 in value, the person shall be imprisoned not more than 10 years or fined not more than $10,000.00, or both.

HISTORY:

Amended 1971, No. 199 (Adj. Sess.), § 15; amended 2013, No. 61, § 2.

§ 2532.
Officer or servant of incorporated bank.

A cashier or other officer, agent, or servant of an incorporated bank who embezzles or fraudulently converts to his or her own use bullion, money, notes, bills, obligations, or securities or other effects or property belonging to and in the possession of such bank or belonging to any person and deposited therein, shall be guilty of larceny and shall be imprisoned not more than 10 years or fined not more than $1,000.00, or both.

HISTORY:

Amended 1971, No. 199 (Adj. Sess.), § 15; 1981, No. 223 (Adj. Sess.), § 23.

§ 2533.
Receiver or trustee.

A receiver or trustee appointed by the court in any litigation in this State, who embezzles or fraudulently converts to his or her own use any money or other property in his or her hands as such receiver or trustee, shall be guilty of larceny and shall be imprisoned not more than 10 years or fined not more than $1,000.00, or both.

HISTORY:

Amended 1971, No. 199 (Adj. Sess.), § 15; 1981, No. 223 (Adj. Sess.), § 23.

§ 2534.
Executor or administrator.

An executor or administrator who embezzles or fraudulently converts to his or her own use, money, obligations, securities, or other effects or property belonging to the estate of which he or she is executor or administrator, shall be guilty of larceny and shall be imprisoned not more than 10 years or fined not more than $1,000.00, or both.

HISTORY:

Amended 1971, No. 199 (Adj. Sess.), § 15; 1981, No. 223 (Adj. Sess.), § 23.

§ 2535.
Guardian.

A guardian who embezzles or fraudulently converts to his or her own use, money, obligations, securities, or other effects or property belonging to the person under guardianship or the estate of the person under guardianship, shall be guilty of larceny and shall be imprisoned not more than 10 years or fined not more than $1,000.00, or both.

HISTORY:

Amended 1971, No. 199 (Adj. Sess.), § 15; 1981, No. 223 (Adj. Sess.), § 23; 2019, No. 77, § 14, eff. June 19, 2019.

§ 2536.
Carrier.

A carrier or other person to whom money, goods, or other property, the subject of larceny, is delivered to be carried for hire, or a person entrusted with such property, who embezzles or fraudulently converts to his or her own use, or secretes with intent to embezzle or fraudulently convert to his or her own use such money, goods, or property before its delivery at the place at which, or to the person to whom, they were to be delivered, shall be imprisoned not more than 10 years or fined not more than $500.00, or both.

HISTORY:

Amended 1971, No. 199 (Adj. Sess.), § 15.

§ 2537.
Person holding property in official capacity or belonging to the State or a municipality.

A State, county, town, or municipal officer or other person who in his or her official capacity receives, collects, controls, or holds money, obligations, securities, or other property, who embezzles or fraudulently converts to his or her own use any of such money, obligations, securities, or other property, or a person who embezzles or fraudulently converts to his or her own use money or other property belonging to the State or to a county or municipality, or a municipal corporation, or a special purpose district, shall be guilty of larceny and shall be imprisoned not more than 10 years or fined not more than $1,000.00, or both.

HISTORY:

Amended 1971, No. 199 (Adj. Sess.), § 15; 1981, No. 223 (Adj. Sess.), § 23; 2007, No. 169 (Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 2538.
School funds.

A person entrusted with the charge of money, land, or other property belonging to a town or school district for the use of schools, who embezzles, misapplies, or conceals the same or any part thereof shall be liable to be removed from his or her trust and shall forfeit to such town or district double the amount so embezzled, misapplied, or concealed, to be recovered in a civil action on this statute, in the name of such town or district, with costs.

§ 2539.
Pleading and proof of money embezzled and time of offense.

In prosecutions for embezzling, fraudulently converting to one’s own use, or taking and secreting with intent so to embezzle or fraudulently convert, the bullion, money, notes, bank notes, checks, drafts, bills of exchange, obligations, or other securities for money, of a person, bank, corporation, or partnership, by a cashier or other officer, clerk, agent, or servant, it shall be sufficient to allege generally in the indictment an embezzlement, fraudulent conversion, or taking with such intent, of money to a certain amount, without specifying the particulars thereof.

At the trial, evidence may be given of any such embezzlement, fraudulent conversion, or taking with such intent committed within six months next before the time stated in the indictment. It shall be sufficient to maintain the charge in the indictment and shall not be deemed a variance if it is proved that bullion, money, notes, bank notes, checks, drafts, bills of exchange, or other securities for money of such person, bank, corporation, or partnership, of whatever amount, were fraudulently embezzled, converted, or taken with such intent by the respondent within such period of six months.